Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 30.
CITY LIBRARIES.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiative petition and adopted at the general election on Nov. 5, 1940, by a vote of 107,115 for and 56,500 against.

§ 1. Petition for tax levy — Election.

Whenever 100 or more taxpaying electors of any city, having a population of not less than 5,000, shall file a petition with the Mayor asking that an annual tax on real and personal property be levied for the purpose of maintaining and operating a public city library and shall specify a rate of taxation not to exceed five mills on the dollar, the question as to whether such tax shall be levied shall be submitted to the qualified electors of such city at a general or special election. Such petition must be filed at least thirty days prior to the election at which it will be submitted to the voters. The ballot shall be in substantially the following form:

For a
mill tax on real and personal property to be used for maintenance and operation of a public city library. Against a
mill tax on real and personal property to be used for maintenance and operation of a public city library. [As amended by Const. Amend. 72, § 1.]

Click to view form.

Publisher's Notes.

Before amendment by Ark. Const. Amend. 72, § 1, this section read: “Whenever 100 or more taxpaying electors of any city, having a population of not less than 5,000, shall file a petition with the Mayor asking that an annual tax on real and personal property be levied for the purpose of maintaining a public city library and shall specify a rate of taxation not exceeding one mill on the dollar, the question as to whether such tax shall be levied shall be submitted to the qualified electors of such city at a general city election. Such petition must be filed at least thirty days prior to the election at which it will be submitted to the voters. The ballot shall be in substantially the following form:

“For a
mill tax on real and personal property to be used for maintenance of a public city library.

“Against a
mill tax on real and personal property to be used for maintenance of a public city library.”

§ 2. Result of election — Certification and proclamation — Tax levy.

The Election Commissioners shall certify to the Mayor the result of the vote, and if a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question at such election vote in favor of the specified tax, then it shall thereafter be continually levied and collected as other general taxes of such city are levied and collected. The result of the election shall be proclaimed by the Mayor. The result so proclaimed shall be conclusive unless attacked in the courts within thirty days. The proceeds of any tax voted for the maintenance of a city public library shall be segregated by the city officials and used only for that purpose.

§ 3. Raising, reducing or abolishing tax — Petition and election.

Whenever 100 or more taxpaying electors of any city having a library tax in force shall file a petition with the Mayor asking that such tax be raised, reduced or abolished, the question shall be submitted to the qualified electors at a general or special election. Such petition must be filed at least thirty days prior to the election at which it will be submitted to the voters. The ballot shall follow, as far as practicable, the form set forth in Section 1 hereof. The result shall be certified and proclaimed, as provided in Section 2 hereof, and the result as proclaimed shall be conclusive unless attacked in the courts within thirty days. Subject to the limitations of Section 5(e) hereof, the tax shall be lowered, raised or abolished, as the case may be, according to the majority of the qualified electors voting on the question of such election. If lowered or raised, the revised tax shall thereafter be continually levied and collected and the proceeds used in the manner and for the purposes as provided in Section 2 hereof. [As amended by Const. Amend. 72, § 2.]

Publisher's Notes.

Before amendment by Ark. Const. Amend. 72, § 2, this section read: “Whenever 100 or more taxpaying electors of any city having a library tax in force shall file a petition with the Mayor asking that such tax be raised, reduced or abolished, the question shall be submitted to the qualified electors at a general city election. Such petition must be filed at least thirty days prior to the election at which it will be submitted to the voters. The ballot shall follow, as far as practicable, the form set forth in Section 1 hereof. The result shall be certified and proclaimed, as provided in Section 2 hereof, and the result as proclaimed shall be conclusive unless attacked in the courts within thirty days. The tax shall be lowered, raised or abolished, as the case may be, according to the majority of the qualified electors voting on the question of such election; provided, however, that it shall not be raised to more than one mill on the dollar. If lowered or raised, the revised tax shall thereafter be continually levied and collected and the proceeds used in the manner and for the purposes as provided for in Section 2 hereof.”

§ 4. Co-ordination of city with county library.

Nothing herein shall be construed as preventing a co-ordination of the services of a city public library and a county public library.

§ 5. Petition for tax levy — Election.

Whenever 100 or more taxpaying electors of any city, having a population of not less than 5,000, shall file a petition with the Mayor asking that an annual tax on real and personal property be levied for capital improvements to or construction of a public city library and shall specify a rate of taxation not to exceed three mills on the dollar, the question as to whether such tax shall be levied shall be submitted to the qualified electors of such city at a general or special election. Such petition must be filed at least thirty days prior to the election at which it will be submitted to the voters. The ballot shall be in substantially the following form:

The electors may authorize the governing body of the city to issue bonds as prescribed by law for capital improvements to or construction of the library and to authorize the pledge of all, or any part of, the tax authorized by this section for the purpose of retiring the bonds. The ballot submitting the question to the voters shall be in substantially the following form:

The maximum rate of any special tax to pay bonded indebtedness, as authorized by paragraph (b) hereof shall be stated on the ballot.

The special tax for payment of bonded indebtedness authorized in paragraph (b) hereof shall constitute a special fund pledged as security for the payment of such indebtedness. The special tax shall never be extended for any purpose, nor collected for any greater length of time than necessary to retire such bonded indebtedness, except that tax receipts in excess of the amount required to retire the debt according to its terms may, subject to covenants entered into with the holders of the bonds, be pledged as security for the issuance of additional bonds if authorized by the voters. The tax for such additional bonds shall terminate within the time provided for the tax originally imposed. Upon retirement of the bonded indebtedness, any surplus tax collections, which may have accumulated shall be transferred to the general funds of the city, and shall be used for maintenance and operation of the public city library.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this amendment, a tax approved by the voters for the purpose of paying the bonded indebtedness shall not be reduced or diminished, nor shall it be used for any other purpose than to pay principal of, premium or interest on, and the reasonable fees of a trustee or paying agent, so long as the bonded indebtedness shall remain outstanding and unpaid. [As added by Const. Amend. 72, § 3; as amended by Const. Amend. 89, § 14.]

For a
mill tax on real and personal property to be used for capital improvements to or construction of a public city library. Against a
mill tax on real and personal property to be used for capital improvements to or construction of a public city library.

Click to view form.

For a
mill tax on real and personal property within the city, to be pledged to an issue or issues of bonds not to exceed $ , in aggregate principal amount, to finance capital improvements to or construction of the city library and to authorize the issuance of the bonds on such terms and conditions as shall be approved by the city. Against a
mill tax on real and personal property within the city, to be pledged to an issue or issues of bonds not to exceed $ , in aggregate principal amount, to finance capital improvements to or construction of the city library and to authorize the issuance of the bonds on such terms and conditions as they shall be approved by the city.

Click to view form.

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 89, § 14, amended this section effective January 1, 2011. Amendment 89 was proposed by H.J.R. 1004 during the 2009 Regular Session and adopted at the 2010 general election by a vote of 448,711 for and 250,167 against.

Before amendment, the introductory language of subsection (b) read: “The electors may authorize the governing body of the city to issue bonds as prescribed by law for capital improvements to or construction of the library and to authorize the pledge of all, or any part of, the tax authorized by this section for the purpose of retiring the bonds. The interest rate on any bonds shall not exceed the rate provided by this Constitution. The ballot submitting the question to the voters shall be in substantially the following form:”